Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.021

Nature, purpose, and duration of entity.

(1) A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners. A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate of limited partnership states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(2) A limited partnership may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose.

(3) A limited partnership has a perpetual duration.

[ 2009 c 188 s 104.]